Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1629 of Title 21, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. It shall be unlawful for any person to create and

disseminate a digitization or synthetic media depicting the name,

image, voice, or likeness of another person without his or her

written consent with the intent to cause emotional, financial,

physical, or reputational harm.

HB3299 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a
fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by
imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed one (1)
year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
2. A violation of this subsection shall be a felony if:
a. the offense results in financial harm to the victim
exceeding Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00),
or
b. the digitized or synthetic media is used for the
purpose of extortion, coercion, blackmail, or to
obtain anything of value through threat or
intimidation.
Upon conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment in the
custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not exceeding
five (5) years, or by a fine not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars
($10,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.
3. Each use or dissemination of digitized or synthetic media
may constitute a separate offense.
4. In addition, such person shall be liable for the amount of
damages, losses and expenses, including court costs and attorney
fees incurred for the unlawful dissemination of digitized or
synthetic content, which may be recovered in a civil action.

HB3299 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

5. It shall be lawful and there shall be no liability for the
creation and dissemination of a digitization or synthetic media for
which the sole purpose is for news reporting, commentary, satire or
parody.
B. 1. Not less than forty-five (45) days preceding a primary,
general, or special election, digitization or synthetic media used
in any political advertising or television commercial depicting the
name, image, voice, or likeness of a political candidate shall
include a disclosure that the advertisement or television commercial
contains digitized or synthetic content. Any person who violates
the provisions of this subsection shall, upon conviction, be guilty
of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for a
term of not more than one (1) year and by a fine of Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00). In addition, such person shall be
liable for the amount of damages, losses and expenses, including
court costs and attorney fees incurred for the unlawful
dissemination of digitized or synthetic content, which may be
recovered in a civil action.
2. Any media advertising agency shall require all content
creators to sign an attestation certifying whether the advertisement
contains digitized or synthetically altered content, as defined in
subsection C of this section, when such digitized or synthetically
altered content is used in the creation of the advertisement. The
attestation shall be retained by the media advertising agency for a
HB3299 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

peri od of not less than twenty-four (24) months and shall be made
available upon request to the appropriate enforcement authority,
C. For purposes of this act:
1. "Digitization" or "synthetic media" means any still image,
video, or audio recording that has been generated or materially
altered using digital or computational techniques so as to falsely
appear authentic, and in a manner that a reasonable person would
believe depicts a real person engaging in speech or conduct that did
not occur; and
2. "Disseminate" means to give, provide, lend, deliver, mail,
send, forward, transfer, or transmit, electronically or otherwise,
to another person.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY AND PUBLIC SAFETY
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/26/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.






HB3299 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.